Maryland, session 2025, SB0064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–325 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–326.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–325.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0064*

SENATE BILL 64
THE NATURAL HISTORY SOCIETY OF MARYLAND IS THE STATE NATURAL
HISTORY MUSEUM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.